Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2897.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.441, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Angling and taking deer and small game; age 70 or older. new text end new text begin (a) A person authorized to issue licenses must issue, without a fee, to a resident who is age 70 or older: new text end new text begin (1) a permanent license to take fish by angling; new text end new text begin (2) an annual license to take deer by firearms or by archery; and new text end new text begin (3) an annual license to take small game. new text end new text begin (b) A driver's license or Minnesota identification card serves as satisfactory evidence to obtain a license under this subdivision at all agent locations. new text end